West Virginia, session 2026, HB4249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of Revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 7 - 1. Lottery Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §29-22E-4 of this code, relating to the Lottery Commission (interactive wagering, 179 CSR 10), is authorized.